Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1501
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that:

(1) The State
of Nebraska is responsible for protecting its natural resources, agricultural
resources, aesthetics, economy, and communities through reasonable regulation
for the common good and welfare. As such, the state is responsible for ensuring
that an oil pipeline proposed to be located within, through, or across Nebraska
is in compliance with all state laws, rules, and regulations relating to water,
air, and wildlife under the Constitution of Nebraska and state law;

(2) Public policy
should reflect this responsibility while simultaneously recognizing the necessity
for energy use and the economic benefits to Nebraska of transporting oil within,
through, or across the state, the need for economic development in Nebraska,
and the opportunities for jobs and revenue that new development brings to
the state;

(3) The United States has the important ability to work with foreign
suppliers of crude oil to meet our overall energy needs and to further our
national security interests; and

(4) The economic benefits of oil pipeline
construction projects are important to the state, including the creation of
jobs. Nevertheless, the benefits of any proposed oil pipeline project must
be weighed against any concerns brought by the residents of Nebraska.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB4, § 1.